District of Columbia statutes.
43-120

Keeping and exhibiting dead bodies.

No dead body or part thereof shall be kept in said District in such manner as to give rise to any offensive odors to the annoyance of any person or persons in the neighborhood or to the public, nor so as to be exposed to the public view; nor shall any such body or part thereof be permitted by the person or persons having custody or control of it to remain unburied for a longer period than 1 week after death without permission of the Director of the Department of Health, unless it has been cremated or deposited in the vault of some cemetery; nor shall any person publicly exhibit in said District, for pay or otherwise, any dead body of any human being or any part of such body without a permit from the Director of the Department of Health of said District so to do, except such exhibition be in connection with some government museum or with some institution of learning permanently located in said District.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1297, ch. 854, § 677
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, §§ 29(c)(2), 30(b)(1), 28 DCR 3271
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, §§ 8(c), 65(c), 53 DCR 6794
This section is referenced in § 7-1531.21, § 43-126, and § 43-128.
1981 Ed., § 27-120.
1973 Ed., § 27-120.
D.C. Law 16-191 substituted “Health” for “Human Services”.